incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiemdviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juodviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jųdviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jodviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jodviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plural -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mes</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mūsų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mumis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mumyse</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūsų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jumis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jumyse</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiems</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joms</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jose</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Second declension -->
    <pardef n="abažūr/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ams</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>asna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="aistringumas"><i>aistringum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alksninukas"><i>alksninuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antigenas"><i>antigen</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apmažtas"><i>apmažt</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archaizmas"><i>archaizm</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astras"><i>astr</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atsišaukimas"><i>atsišaukim</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autentiškumas"><i>autentiškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baidas"><i>baid</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bankininkas"><i>bankinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beldikas"><i>beldik</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biudžetas"><i>biudžet</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="braškynas"><i>braškyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="butaforas"><i>butafor</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciklonas"><i>ciklon</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darželinukas"><i>darželinuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="denatūratas"><i>denatūrat</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diferencialas"><i>diferencial</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dominas"><i>domin</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="druskynas"><i>druskyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvilinkumas"><i>dvilinkum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekologas"><i>ekolog</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enciklopediškumas"><i>enciklopediškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ežeringumas"><i>ežeringum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiktyvumas"><i>fiktyvum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frazeologizmas"><i>frazeologizm</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garažas"><i>garaž</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geometras"><i>geometr</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glitas"><i>glit</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grandiškumas"><i>grandiškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grįžulas"><i>grįžul</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gąslumas"><i>gąslum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horoskopas"><i>horoskop</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="individas"><i>individ</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ižas"><i>iž</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalvinizmas"><i>kalvinizm</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaulas"><i>kaul</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirslas"><i>kirsl</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komersantas"><i>komersant</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krankalas"><i>krankal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvaišalas"><i>kvaišal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leidimas"><i>leidim</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lotosas"><i>lotos</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="markumas"><i>markum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metraštininkas"><i>metraštinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monotoniškumas"><i>monotoniškum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nedorumas"><i>nedorum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuodugnumas"><i>nuodugnum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pabūklas"><i>pabūkl</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paprastumas"><i>paprastum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pavaizdumas"><i>pavaizdum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perspektyvumas"><i>perspektyvum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pleiskanotumas"><i>pleiskanotum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="praeinamumas"><i>praeinamum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primanumas"><i>primanum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pušynas"><i>pušyn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rebusas"><i>rebus</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rinkliavininkas"><i>rinkliavinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saksofonas"><i>saksofon</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="septintokas"><i>septintok</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skautininkas"><i>skautinink</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slėsnumas"><i>slėsnum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprogalas"><i>sprogal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stropumas"><i>stropum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sėjinukas"><i>sėjinuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tekėlas"><i>tekėl</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tragizmas"><i>tragizm</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tusulas"><i>tusul</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="užkišalas"><i>užkišal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valytuvas"><i>valytuv</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veršiukas"><i>veršiuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vokas"><i>vok</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įskalas"><i>įskal</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šatrynas"><i>šatryn</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šokas"><i>šok</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žalsvumas"><i>žalsvum</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žvyninukas"><i>žvyninuk</i><par n="abažūr/as__n"/></e>
